FULLXIP/parSem/xip/archive/simple.1/esperanto/GRAMMARS/ENGLISH/FST/src/HMM/amb-net.xfst
# ============================================================================
# FILE:		/opt/Mltt/lingdata/spa/lex/src/amb-net.xfst
# CONTENT:	(x)fst script for computing lexical ambiguity classes
#
# LANGUAGE:	ENGLISH
#
# AUTHOR:	A. Schiller
#
# CREATED:	13-Aug-1999
#
# ============================================================================
# USAGE:	xfst -s [LexFST] -l [ThisFile]
# ============================================================================

unoptimize net

define LEX

# -------------------------------------------------------------------
# add capitalized words
define CAP 	[ a (->) A, b (->) B, c (->) C, d (->) D, e (->) E, f (->) F,
		  g (->) G, h (->) H, i (->) I, j (->) J, k (->) K, l (->) L,
		  m (->) M, n (->) N, o (->) O, p (->) P, q (->) Q, r (->) R,
		  s (->) S, t (->) T, u (->) U, v (->) V, w (->) W, x (->) X,
		  y (->) Y, z (->) Z || .#. _  ];

define LEX  LEX .o. CAP ;


# -------------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> remove upper-side characters
define LEX	[ 0 <- ? || _ ? ] .o. LEX ;

echo >>> identify tags and characters
define TAG	LEX.1;
define ANY	\[TAG]; 

echo >>> compute ambiguity net
regex LEX;
ambiguity net
define AMB


echo >>> remove characters from upper side
read regex [ [ 0 <- ANY ] .o. AMB ]; 
